District of Columbia statutes.
50-1541.07

Creation and cancellation of certificate of title.

(a)

Unless an application for a certificate of title is rejected under subsection (c) or (d) of this section, the Harbor Master shall create a certificate of title for the vessel in accordance with subsection (b) of this section not later than 20 days after delivery to it of an application that complies with § 50-1541.06.

(b)

If the Harbor Master creates electronic certificates of title, the Harbor Master shall create an electronic certificate of title unless the secured party of record or, if none, the owner of record, requests in the application that the Harbor Master create a written certificate of title.

(c)

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this section, the Harbor Master may reject an application for a certificate of title only if:

(1)

The application does not comply with § 50-1541.06;

(2)

The application does not contain documentation sufficient for the Harbor Master to determine whether the applicant is entitled to a certificate of title;

(3)

There is a reasonable basis for concluding that the application is fraudulent or issuance of a certificate of title would facilitate a fraudulent or illegal act; or

(4)

The application does not comply with the law of the District other than this chapter.

(d)

The Harbor Master shall reject an application for a certificate of title for a vessel that is a documented vessel or a foreign-documented vessel.

(e)

The Harbor Master may cancel a certificate of title created by it only if the Harbor Master:

(1)

Could have rejected the application for the certificate of title under subsection (c) of this section;

(2)

Is required to cancel the certificate of title under another provision of this chapter; or

(3)

Receives satisfactory evidence that the vessel is a documented vessel or a foreign-documented vessel.

History

Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-215, § 8, 61 DCR 13083

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-215: Section 32 of D.C. Law 20-215 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2016.